lib/dict/lt.aff
SFX T ti      siantiems       [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      sianèius        [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      sianèiais       [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      sianèiuose      [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      ià              [sð]ti
SFX T ti      iantys          [sð]ti
SFX T ti      ianèiø          [sð]ti
SFX T ti      iantiems        [sð]ti
SFX T ti      ianèius         [sð]ti
SFX T ti      ianèiais        [sð]ti
SFX T ti      ianèiuose       [sð]ti
SFX T zti     sià             zti
SFX T zti     siantys         zti
SFX T zti     sianèiø         zti
SFX T zti     siantiems       zti
SFX T zti     sianèius        zti
SFX T zti     sianèiais       zti
SFX T zti     sianèiuose      zti
SFX T þti     ðià             þti
SFX T þti     ðiantys         þti
SFX T þti     ðianèiø         þti
SFX T þti     ðiantiems       þti
SFX T þti     ðianèius        þti
SFX T þti     ðianèiais       þti
SFX T þti     ðianèiuose      þti
SFX T ti      sianèioms       [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      sianèias        [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      sianèiomis      [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      sianèiose       [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      ianèioms        [sð]ti
SFX T ti      ianèias         [sð]ti
SFX T ti      ianèiomis       [sð]ti
SFX T ti      ianèiose        [sð]ti
SFX T zti     sianèioms       zti
SFX T zti     sianèias        zti
SFX T zti     sianèiomis      zti
SFX T zti     sianèiose       zti
SFX T þti     ðianèioms       þti
SFX T þti     ðianèias        þti
SFX T þti     ðianèiomis      þti
SFX T þti     ðianèiose       þti
SFX T ti      siantysis       [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      sianèiojo       [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      sianèiajam      [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      siantájá        [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      sianèiuoju      [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      sianèiajame     [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      iantysis        [sð]ti
SFX T ti      ianèiojo        [sð]ti
SFX T ti      ianèiajam       [sð]ti
SFX T ti      iantájá         [sð]ti
SFX T ti      ianèiuoju       [sð]ti
SFX T ti      ianèiajame      [sð]ti
SFX T zti     siantysis       zti
SFX T zti     sianèiojo       zti
SFX T zti     sianèiajam      zti
SFX T zti     siantájá        zti
SFX T zti     sianèiuoju      zti
SFX T zti     sianèiajame     zti
SFX T þti     ðiantysis       þti
SFX T þti     ðianèiojo       þti
SFX T þti     ðianèiajam      þti
SFX T þti     ðiantájá        þti
SFX T þti     ðianèiuoju      þti
SFX T þti     ðianèiajame     þti
SFX T ti      sianèioji       [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      sianèiosios     [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      sianèiajai      [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      sianèiàjà       [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      sianèiàja       [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      sianèiojoje     [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      sianèiojoj      [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      ianèioji        [sð]ti
SFX T ti      ianèiosios      [sð]ti
SFX T ti      ianèiajai       [sð]ti
SFX T ti      ianèiàjà        [sð]ti
SFX T ti      ianèiàja        [sð]ti
SFX T ti      ianèiojoje      [sð]ti
SFX T ti      ianèiojoj       [sð]ti
SFX T zti     sianèioji       zti
SFX T zti     sianèiosios     zti
SFX T zti     sianèiajai      zti
SFX T zti     sianèiàjà       zti
SFX T zti     sianèiàja       zti
SFX T zti     sianèiojoje     zti
SFX T zti     sianèiojoj      zti
SFX T þti     ðianèioji       þti
SFX T þti     ðianèiosios     þti
SFX T þti     ðianèiajai      þti
SFX T þti     ðianèiàjà       þti
SFX T þti     ðianèiàja       þti
SFX T þti     ðianèiojoje     þti
SFX T þti     ðianèiojoj      þti
SFX T ti      siantieji       [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      sianèiøjø       [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      siantiesiems    [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      sianèiuosius    [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      sianèiaisiais   [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      sianèiuosiuose  [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      iantieji        [sð]ti
SFX T ti      ianèiøjø        [sð]ti
SFX T ti      iantiesiems     [sð]ti
SFX T ti      ianèiuosius     [sð]ti
SFX T ti      ianèiaisiais    [sð]ti
SFX T ti      ianèiuosiuose   [sð]ti
SFX T zti     siantieji       zti
SFX T zti     sianèiøjø       zti
SFX T zti     siantiesiems    zti
SFX T zti     sianèiuosius    zti
SFX T zti     sianèiaisiais   zti
SFX T zti     sianèiuosiuose  zti
SFX T þti     ðiantieji       þti
SFX T þti     ðianèiøjø       þti
SFX T þti     ðiantiesiems    þti
SFX T þti     ðianèiuosius    þti
SFX T þti     ðianèiaisiais   þti
SFX T þti     ðianèiuosiuose  þti
SFX T ti      sianèiosioms    [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      sianèiàsias     [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      sianèiosiomis   [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      sianèiosiose    [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      ianèiosioms     [sð]ti
SFX T ti      ianèiàsias      [sð]ti
SFX T ti      ianèiosiomis    [sð]ti
SFX T ti      ianèiosiose     [sð]ti
SFX T zti     sianèiosioms    zti
SFX T zti     sianèiàsias     zti
SFX T zti     sianèiosiomis   zti
SFX T zti     sianèiosiose    zti
SFX T þti     ðianèiosioms    þti
SFX T þti     ðianèiàsias     þti
SFX T þti     ðianèiosiomis   þti
SFX T þti     ðianèiosiose    þti
SFX T ti      simas           [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      simo            [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      simam           [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      simà            [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      simu            [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      simame          [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      imas            [sð]ti
SFX T ti      imo             [sð]ti
SFX T ti      imam            [sð]ti
SFX T ti      imà             [sð]ti
SFX T ti      imu             [sð]ti
SFX T ti      imame           [sð]ti
SFX T zti     simas           zti
SFX T zti     simo            zti
SFX T zti     simam           zti
SFX T zti     simà            zti
SFX T zti     simu            zti
SFX T zti     simame          zti
SFX T þti     ðimas           þti
SFX T þti     ðimo            þti
SFX T þti     ðimam           þti
SFX T þti     ðimà            þti
SFX T þti     ðimu            þti
SFX T þti     ðimame          þti
SFX T ti      sima            [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      simos           [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      simai           [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      simoje          [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      simoj           [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      ima             [sð]ti
SFX T ti      imos            [sð]ti
SFX T ti      imai            [sð]ti
SFX T ti      imoje           [sð]ti
SFX T ti      imoj            [sð]ti
SFX T zti     sima            zti
SFX T zti     simos           zti
SFX T zti     simai           zti
SFX T zti     simoje          zti
SFX T zti     simoj           zti
SFX T þti     ðima            þti
SFX T þti     ðimos           þti
SFX T þti     ðimai           þti
SFX T þti     ðimoje          þti
SFX T þti     ðimoj           þti
SFX T ti      simi            [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      simø            [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      simiems         [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      simus           [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      simais          [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      simuose         [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      imi             [sð]ti
SFX T ti      imø             [sð]ti
SFX T ti      imiems          [sð]ti
SFX T ti      imus            [sð]ti
SFX T ti      imais           [sð]ti
SFX T ti      imuose          [sð]ti
SFX T zti     simi            zti
SFX T zti     simø            zti
SFX T zti     simiems         zti
SFX T zti     simus           zti
SFX T zti     simais          zti
SFX T zti     simuose         zti
SFX T þti     ðimi            þti
SFX T þti     ðimø            þti
SFX T þti     ðimiems         þti
SFX T þti     ðimus           þti
SFX T þti     ðimais          þti
SFX T þti     ðimuose         þti
SFX T ti      simoms          [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      simomis         [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      simose          [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      imoms           [sð]ti
SFX T ti      imomis          [sð]ti
SFX T ti      imose           [sð]ti
SFX T zti     simoms          zti
SFX T zti     simomis         zti
SFX T zti     simose          zti
SFX T þti     ðimoms          þti
SFX T þti     ðimomis         þti
SFX T þti     ðimose          þti
SFX T ti      simasis         [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      simojo          [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      simajam         [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      simàjá          [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      simuoju         [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      simajame        [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      imasis          [sð]ti
