lib/dict/lt.dic
şabuoti/NTX
şagèioti/NTX
aişyti/NRTWXdjkpv
ğakaliauti/NTX
akompanuoti/NTX
aliejuoti/NRTXkw
şaloti/NRSTXkw
ğalventi/NTX
aneksuoti/NTX
antrameèiauti/NTX
apyniauti/NTXd
archyvuoti/STXdkpw
ğarmoti/NTXaef
asistuoti/NTX
ğatrauti/NTX
ğaudyti/NRSTWXabcdfijkmnpruw
aukğtinti/NRSTXdefhjkprv
avieèiauti/NTX
bailëti/NTX
balsuoti/NTXdefhkl
bambëti/NTXdfk
barkğoti/NTXd
bauduoti/RSTXadfkprvw
beicuoti/NTX
betonuoti/NTXdl
bilstelëti/NTX
birenti/NTXl
bjaurinti/NTXacdjk
blevyzgoti/NTXefirvx
blizguoti/NTX
blëstelëti/NTX
bombarduoti/NTXk
brakğëti/NTX
breikğti/NTX
brûkğtelëti/NTX
brukuoti/NTX
bubtelëti/NTX
burbsëti/NTX
buzoti/NTX
centruoti/NRSTXdk
cingtelëti/NTX
cypèioti/NTX
ádaguoti/NTX
dalinëti/NTXdf
dargti/NTXd
dëbèioti/NTX
dedinti/NTX
deklaruoti/NTX
demoralizuoti/RSTX
dervuoti/NRTXcdep
diagnozuoti/NTX
dilbsoti/NTX
dingsoti/NTX
dirgti/NTXbdk
dispanserizuoti/NTX
dykëti/NTX
dëlioti/NRSTXabcdefhijklnptuvw
doroti/NRSTXabefkmnrw
draminti/NTX
drengti/NTXaek
dribsnoti/NTX
driokstelëti/NTX
dërti/NTXf
dujëti/NTX
durstelëti/NTX
dvoklinti/NTXcde
dzingsëti/NTX
èeşenti/NTX
elektrifikuoti/NTX
ğerdinti/NTX
fabrikuoti/NTXk
gagnoti/NTX
galvanizuoti/NTX
garëti/NRTXdp
gelsvëti/NTXf
gildyti/NTWXk
girkğnoti/NTX
glaudyti/NRTWX
globstyti/NTWX
gobëti/NRSTX
granuliuoti/NTX
gribğtelëti/NTX
grybauti/NRTXefjnqrtv
grumğnoti/NTX
guginti/NRSTX
gurinti/NTXdek
ğiauduoti/NTXj
şibtelëti/NTX
èiûèiuoti/NTXfl
ğiltinti/NTXa
inkğèioti/NTX
şiojëti/NTX
şirgliuoti/NTX
irzti/NTXk
èiulbuoti/NTX
èiurkğnoti/NTX
şyburiuoti/NTX
jaunëti/NTXbf
juokuoti/NTX
kaipti/NTX
kalsnoti/NTX
kapnoti/NTX
karstyti/NRSTWXadejklmprvw
kauğkëti/NTX
kekiuoti/RSTX
kerëplinti/NRTXfklx
kiautëti/NTX
kimti/NTXbfjl
kirmgrauşoti/NTX
kiurti/NTXdik
klajoti/NRSTXabdefgijklpqrtvx
kleinioti/NTX
klibikğtuoti/NTX
kliukenti/NTX
klostinëti/NTX
knaibyti/NTWXbdf
kniaukti/NTXekl
knykti/NTX
komutuoti/NTX
koptelëti/NTX
kraminëti/NTX
kredituoti/NTX
kriauğyti/NTWX
kriunëti/NTXd
krësti/NTXabcdefhjklmopqrvwx
kugşdëti/NTXkw
kumsëti/NTX
kurpyti/NTWXk
kvakğëti/NTX
kvëğinti/NTX
laibëti/NTXk
lakğtuoti/NTX
lapnoti/NTXjk
ğlûbèioti/NTX
lemti/NTXe
lesioti/NTXjk
liesëti/NTXfk
linktelti/NTX
ğliukğtelëti/NTX
lygiuoti/NRSTXdfkpw
loğinëti/RSTXabdfhiklmnopqrtuvwx
luoptelëti/NTX
mainyti/NRSTWXabcdfhijkmnoprtw
mandagëti/NTX
mastuoti/NTX
mechaninti/NTX
mergauti/NTXdfij
migtelëti/NTX
mirgtelëti/NTX
mykti/NTXek
şmoginti/NTXk
movinëti/NTX
murkdyti/NTWXclv
nagrinëti/NRSTXdefhpr
ğnarëti/NTXk
ğnerkğti/NRSTXajlmvx
niûktelëti/NTX
ğniukğtelëti/NTX
nokti/NTXadefhijk
nuometuoti/NTX
operuoti/NTXdfp
pagvelsti/NTX
pakrypëti/NTX
panëğëti/NTX
pasikumpinti/NTX
paukğëti/NTXk
pelnikauti/NTXr
piketuoti/NTX
pinti/NRSTXacdefhjklopqrtvw
pyptelëti/NTX
plaukioti/NRSTXadfijknqruv
plerpti/NTXdkl
pliûryti/NTWX
plyğauti/NTX
plëğti/NRSTXabcdefhijklmnopqrtuvwx
ponauti/NTX
pramoninti/NTXk
prieğpieèiauti/NTX
protokoluoti/NTXl
pukğtelëti/NTX
purkğëti/NTX
raganauti/NTX
raizgyti/NRTWXabdejklpw
rağtuoti/NTXd
reanimuoti/NTX
reorganizuoti/NTX
rûgğtëti/NTXf
rimtinti/NTX
rymoti/NTXei
rëplinti/NTX
ruoğti/NRSTXacdfjkmoprvw
sakauti/NTX
sapnuoti/NRSTXdfjkmrv
seilinti/NTXfjk
siaubti/NTXe
silkiuoti/NTX
siurbèioti/NTX
skambaliuoti/NTX
skeletuoti/NTX
skystelëti/NTX
skraidinëti/NTX
skuduriuoti/NTX
slûgti/NTXbcek
sluoguoti/NTX
smeigti/NRTXcefhjkloqrtv
smukti/NTXacdefikl
sodrinti/NTXc
speisti/NRTXjklv
spëjinëti/NTXc
sproginëti/NTXk
sriûbèioti/NTXf
standinti/NTXfk
stiebti/NRSTXr
stypsëti/NTX
strapsëti/NTX
stulbti/NTXa
sukalioti/NRSTX
sunkëti/NTXf
suspigti/NTX
sveikti/NTXfk
svoèiauti/NTX
talkinëti/NRTX
tarinëti/NTXabcdefhjlmrw
tausti/NTXe
telkğoti/NTX
teşti/NTXdfk
timpsëti/NTX
tirtëti/NTXk
toptelëti/NTX
transformuoti/NRSTX
treniruoti/NRSTXbdfhprt
triğkuoti/NTX
tryğkinti/NTX
trukèioti/NTXf
tuksenti/NTXdfklorv
tutinti/NTX
tvinkèioti/NTX
uşgaidauti/NTX
ğuoliuoti/NTXb
utilizuoti/NTX
şvaigşdëti/RSTX
vakarauti/NTX
valkstyti/NRSTWXaehl
vapenti/NTX
varnauti/NTX
vëbrinti/NTX
veldinti/NTX
vepëti/NTX
vëgëliauti/NTX
şvigdyti/NTWX
vilnyti/NTWXk
vipti/NTXbd
virpëti/NTXk
vizguliuoti/NTX
vyşti/NTX
ğvokğtelëti/NTX
zagnoti/NTX
zmekinti/NTXk
